rut_phon.twol
Alphabet
  а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь I э ю я
  %{аь%}:аь
  %{уь%}:уь
  %{аI%}:аI
  %{уI%}:уI
  %{ыI%}:ыI
  %{бы%}:0 %{бы%}:бы
  %{н%}:0 %{н%}:н
  %{д%}:0 %{д%}:д
  %{ы%}:ы %{ы%}:%{ы%}
  %{а%}:%{а%}
  %{и%}:ы %{и%}:%{и%}
  %{adess%}:%{да%} %{adess%}:%{де%}
  %{ды%}
  %{да%}
  %{iness%}
  %{inel%}
  %{superess%}
  %{да%}
  %{даа%}
  %{хда%}
  %{хълаа%}
;

Sets
  Vowel = а е ё и о у ы э ю я %{аь%} %{уь%} %{аI%} %{уI%} %{ыI%} %{и%} %{ы%} %{а%};
  Consonant = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ь ъ I;
  Soft = е и %{аь%} %{уь%} %{и%};

Rules

"хьибыб --> хьиб"
%{бы%}:0 <=> _ б ;

"сын- and кьуIн- before suffixes beginning with н-"
%{н%}:0 <=> _ н ;

"хьуд- before suffixes beginning with н-"
%{д%}:0 <=> _ н ;

"INESSIVE marker for soft stems"
InessE:е <=> _ %{iness%} ;
			where InessE in (и %{аь%} %{уь%} %{и%})
			matched ;

"INESSIVE marker for pharyngalized stems"
InessAI:аI <=> _ %{iness%} ;
			where InessAI in (%{уI%} %{ыI%})
			matched ;

"INESSIVE marker for hard stems"
InessA:а <=> _ %{iness%} ;
			where InessA in (ы э у о %{ы%} %{а%})
			matched ;

"INEL marker"
V:аа <=> _ %{inel%} ;
			where V in (а е ё и о у ы э ю я %{аь%} %{уь%} %{аI%} %{уI%} %{ыI%} %{ы%} %{и%} %{а%})
			matched ;

"SUPERESSIVE marker for e and a"
SuperessA:аа <=> _ %{superess%} ;
			where SuperessA in (е а %{аь%} %{аI%} %{а%})
			matched ;

"SUPERESSIVE marker for the rest"
SuperessY:ыы <=> _ %{superess%} ;
			where SuperessY in (ё и о у ы э ю я %{уь%} %{уI%} %{ыI%} %{ы%} %{и%})
			matched ;

"ADESSIVE marker rules"
%{adess%}:%{де%} <=> Soft _ ;

"-ɨ stem ADESS without vowel deletion"
%{ы%}:ы <=> _ %{да%} ;

"-ɨ to zero in sonorant and -ɨr types in ATTR"
V:0 <=> _ %{ды%} ;
			where V in (%{ы%} %{и%} %{а%})
			matched;

"-ɨ to zero in sonorant and -ɨr types in ADEL"
V:0 <=> _ %{даа%} ;
			where V in (%{ы%} %{и%} %{а%})
			matched;

"-i to -ɨ in sonorant soft stem in POSTESS"
%{и%}:ы <=> _ %{хда%} ;

"-i to -ɨ in sonorant soft stem in POSTEL"
%{и%}:ы <=> _ %{хълаа%} ;
